Illinois, session 104th, HB4247.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 522-30 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-30)7    Sec. 22-30. Self-administration and self-carry of asthma 8medication and epinephrine injectors; administration of 9undesignated epinephrine injectors; administration of an 10opioid antagonist; administration of undesignated asthma 11medication; supply of undesignated oxygen tanks; asthma 12episode emergency response protocol.13    (a) For the purpose of this Section only, the following 14terms shall have the meanings set forth below:15    "Asthma action plan" means a written plan developed with a 16pupil's medical provider to help control the pupil's asthma. 17The goal of an asthma action plan is to reduce or prevent 18flare-ups and emergency department visits through day-to-day 19management and to serve as a student-specific document to be 20referenced in the event of an asthma episode.21    "Asthma episode emergency response protocol" means a 22procedure to provide assistance to a pupil experiencing 23symptoms of wheezing, coughing, shortness of breath, chest   HB4247 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1tightness, or breathing difficulty.2    "Epinephrine injector" includes an auto-injector approved 3by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the 4administration of epinephrine and a pre-filled syringe 5approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and 6used for the administration of epinephrine that contains a 7pre-measured dose of epinephrine that is equivalent to the 8dosages used in an auto-injector. 9    "Asthma medication" means quick-relief asthma medication, 10including albuterol or other short-acting bronchodilators, 11that is approved by the United States Food and Drug 12Administration for the treatment of respiratory distress. 13"Asthma medication" includes medication delivered through a 14device, including a metered dose inhaler with a reusable or 15disposable spacer or a nebulizer with a mouthpiece or mask.16    "Athletic trainer" means a licensed athletic trainer hired 17by or contracted by a school district or the governing body of 18a charter school or nonpublic school to aid a school in the 19evaluation, prevention, or physical reconditioning of injuries 20and the management of asthma, the prevention of asthma 21symptoms, and emergency asthma response in a school setting. 22    "Coach" means a volunteer or employee of a school who is 23responsible for organizing and supervising students to teach 24or train them in the fundamental skills of an interscholastic 25athletic activity. "Coach" refers to both a head coach and an 26assistant coach.   HB4247 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1    "Opioid antagonist" means a drug that binds to opioid 2receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of opioids acting 3on those receptors, including, but not limited to, naloxone 4hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug approved by 5the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. 6    "Respiratory distress" means the perceived or actual 7presence of wheezing, coughing, shortness of breath, chest 8tightness, breathing difficulty, or any other symptoms 9consistent with asthma. Respiratory distress may be 10categorized as "mild-to-moderate" or "severe". 11    "School nurse" means a registered nurse working in a 12school with or without licensure endorsed in school nursing. 13    "Self-administration" means a pupil's discretionary use of 14his or her prescribed asthma medication or epinephrine 15injector.16    "Self-carry" means a pupil's ability to carry his or her 17prescribed asthma medication or epinephrine injector.18    "Standing protocol" may be issued by (i) a physician 19licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, (ii) a 20licensed physician assistant with prescriptive authority, or 21(iii) a licensed advanced practice registered nurse with 22prescriptive authority. 23    "Trained personnel" means any school employee, coach, 24athletic trainer, or volunteer personnel authorized in 25Sections 10-22.34, 10-22.34a, and 10-22.34b of this Code who 26has completed training under subsection (g) of this Section to   HB4247 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1recognize and respond to anaphylaxis, an opioid overdose, or 2respiratory distress.3    "Undesignated asthma medication" means asthma medication 4prescribed in the name of a school district, public school, 5charter school, or nonpublic school.6    "Undesignated epinephrine injector" means an epinephrine 7injector prescribed in the name of a school district, public 8school, charter school, or nonpublic school. 9    (b) A school, whether public, charter, or nonpublic, must 10permit the self-administration and self-carry of asthma 11medication by a pupil with asthma or the self-administration 12and self-carry of an epinephrine injector by a pupil, provided 13that:14        (1) the parents or guardians of the pupil provide to 15    the school (i) written authorization from the parents or 16    guardians for (A) the self-administration and self-carry 17    of asthma medication or (B) the self-carry of asthma 18    medication or (ii) for (A) the self-administration and 19    self-carry of an epinephrine injector or (B) the 20    self-carry of an epinephrine injector, written 21    authorization from the pupil's physician, physician 22    assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse; and23        (2) the parents or guardians of the pupil provide to 24    the school (i) the prescription label, which must contain 25    the name of the asthma medication, the prescribed dosage, 26    and the time at which or circumstances under which the   HB4247 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1    asthma medication is to be administered, or (ii) for the 2    self-administration or self-carry of an epinephrine 3    injector, a written statement from the pupil's physician, 4    physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse 5    containing the following information:6            (A) the name and purpose of the epinephrine 7        injector;8            (B) the prescribed dosage; and9            (C) the time or times at which or the special 10        circumstances under which the epinephrine injector is 11        to be administered.12The information provided shall be kept on file in the office of 13the school nurse or, in the absence of a school nurse, the 14school's administrator.15    (b-5) A school district, public school, charter school, or 16nonpublic school may authorize the provision of a 17student-specific or undesignated epinephrine injector to a 18student or any personnel authorized under a student's 19Individual Health Care Action Plan, allergy emergency action 20plan, or plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal 21Rehabilitation Act of 1973 to administer an epinephrine 22injector to the student, that meets the student's prescription 23on file.24    (b-10) The school district, public school, charter school, 25or nonpublic school may authorize a school nurse or trained 26personnel to do the following: (i) provide an undesignated   HB4247 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1epinephrine injector to a student for self-administration only 2or any personnel authorized under a student's Individual 3Health Care Action Plan, allergy emergency action plan, plan 4pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 51973, or individualized education program plan to administer 6to the student that meets the student's prescription on file; 7(ii) administer an undesignated epinephrine injector that 8meets the prescription on file to any student who has an 9Individual Health Care Action Plan, allergy emergency action 10plan, plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal 11Rehabilitation Act of 1973, or individualized education 12program plan that authorizes the use of an epinephrine 13injector; (iii) administer an undesignated epinephrine 14injector to any person that the school nurse or trained 15personnel in good faith believes is having an anaphylactic 16reaction; (iv) administer an opioid antagonist to any person 17that the school nurse or trained personnel in good faith 18believes is having an opioid overdose; (v) provide 19undesignated asthma medication to a student for 20self-administration only or to any personnel authorized under 21a student's Individual Health Care Action Plan or asthma 22action plan, plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal 23Rehabilitation Act of 1973, or individualized education 24program plan to administer to the student that meets the 25student's prescription on file; (vi) administer undesignated 26asthma medication that meets the prescription on file to any   HB4247 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1student who has an Individual Health Care Action Plan or 2asthma action plan, plan pursuant to Section 504 of the 3federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, or individualized 4education program plan that authorizes the use of asthma 5medication; and (vii) administer undesignated asthma 6medication to any person that the school nurse or trained 7personnel believes in good faith is having respiratory 8distress. 9    (c) The school district, public school, charter school, or 10nonpublic school must inform the parents or guardians of the 11pupil, in writing, that the school district, public school, 12charter school, or nonpublic school and its employees and 13agents, including a physician, physician assistant, or 14advanced practice registered nurse providing standing protocol 15and a prescription for school epinephrine injectors, an opioid 16antagonist, or undesignated asthma medication, are to incur no 17liability or professional discipline, except for willful and 18wanton conduct, as a result of any injury arising from the 19administration of asthma medication, an epinephrine injector, 20or an opioid antagonist regardless of whether authorization 21was given by the pupil's parents or guardians or by the pupil's 22physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 23registered nurse. The parents or guardians of the pupil must 24sign a statement acknowledging that the school district, 25public school, charter school, or nonpublic school and its 26employees and agents are to incur no liability, except for   HB4247 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1willful and wanton conduct, as a result of any injury arising 2from the administration of asthma medication, an epinephrine 3injector, or an opioid antagonist regardless of whether 4authorization was given by the pupil's parents or guardians or 5by the pupil's physician, physician assistant, or advanced 6practice registered nurse and that the parents or guardians 7must indemnify and hold harmless the school district, public 8school, charter school, or nonpublic school and its employees 9and agents against any claims, except a claim based on willful 10and wanton conduct, arising out of the administration of 11asthma medication, an epinephrine injector, or an opioid 12antagonist regardless of whether authorization was given by 13the pupil's parents or guardians or by the pupil's physician, 14physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse.15    (c-5) When a school nurse or trained personnel administers 16an undesignated epinephrine injector to a person whom the 17school nurse or trained personnel in good faith believes is 18having an anaphylactic reaction, administers an opioid 19antagonist to a person whom the school nurse or trained 20personnel in good faith believes is having an opioid overdose, 21or administers undesignated asthma medication to a person whom 22the school nurse or trained personnel in good faith believes 23is having respiratory distress, notwithstanding the lack of 24notice to the parents or guardians of the pupil or the absence 25of the parents or guardians signed statement acknowledging no 26liability, except for willful and wanton conduct, the school   HB4247 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1district, public school, charter school, or nonpublic school 2and its employees and agents, and a physician, a physician 3assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse providing 4standing protocol and a prescription for undesignated 5epinephrine injectors, an opioid antagonist, or undesignated 6asthma medication, are to incur no liability or professional 7discipline, except for willful and wanton conduct, as a result 8of any injury arising from the use of an undesignated 9epinephrine injector, the use of an opioid antagonist, or the 10use of undesignated asthma medication, regardless of whether 11authorization was given by the pupil's parents or guardians or 12by the pupil's physician, physician assistant, or advanced 13practice registered nurse.14    (d) The permission for self-administration and self-carry 15of asthma medication or the self-administration and self-carry 16of an epinephrine injector is effective for the school year 17for which it is granted and shall be renewed each subsequent 18school year upon fulfillment of the requirements of this 19Section.20    (e) Provided that the requirements of this Section are 21fulfilled, a pupil with asthma may self-administer and 22self-carry his or her asthma medication or a pupil may 23self-administer and self-carry an epinephrine injector (i) 24while in school, (ii) while at a school-sponsored activity, 25(iii) while under the supervision of school personnel, or (iv) 26before or after normal school activities, such as while in   HB4247 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1before-school or after-school care on school-operated property 2or while being transported on a school bus.3    (e-5) Provided that the requirements of this Section are 4fulfilled, a school nurse or trained personnel may administer 5an undesignated epinephrine injector to any person whom the 6school nurse or trained personnel in good faith believes to be 7having an anaphylactic reaction (i) while in school, (ii) 8while at a school-sponsored activity, (iii) while under the 9supervision of school personnel, or (iv) before or after 10normal school activities, such as while in before-school or 11after-school care on school-operated property or while being 12transported on a school bus. A school nurse or trained 13personnel may carry undesignated epinephrine injectors on his 14or her person while in school or at a school-sponsored 15activity. 16    (e-10) Provided that the requirements of this Section are 17fulfilled, a school nurse or trained personnel may administer 18an opioid antagonist to any person whom the school nurse or 19trained personnel in good faith believes to be having an 20opioid overdose (i) while in school, (ii) while at a 21school-sponsored activity, (iii) while under the supervision 22of school personnel, or (iv) before or after normal school 23activities, such as while in before-school or after-school 24care on school-operated property. A school nurse or trained 25personnel may carry an opioid antagonist on his or her person 26while in school or at a school-sponsored activity.   HB4247 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1    (e-15) If the requirements of this Section are met, a 2school nurse or trained personnel may administer undesignated 3asthma medication to any person whom the school nurse or 4trained personnel in good faith believes to be experiencing 5respiratory distress (i) while in school, (ii) while at a 6school-sponsored activity, (iii) while under the supervision 7of school personnel, or (iv) before or after normal school 8activities, including before-school or after-school care on 9school-operated property. A school nurse or trained personnel 10may carry undesignated asthma medication on his or her person 11while in school or at a school-sponsored activity. 12    (f) The school district, public school, charter school, or 13nonpublic school may maintain a supply of undesignated 14epinephrine injectors in any secure location that is 15accessible before, during, and after school where an allergic 16person is most at risk, including, but not limited to, 17classrooms and lunchrooms. A physician, a physician assistant 18who has prescriptive authority in accordance with Section 7.5 19of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, or an 20advanced practice registered nurse who has prescriptive 21authority in accordance with Section 65-40 of the Nurse 22Practice Act may prescribe undesignated epinephrine injectors 23in the name of the school district, public school, charter 24school, or nonpublic school to be maintained for use when 25necessary. Any supply of epinephrine injectors shall be 26maintained in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions.  HB4247 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1    The school district, public school, charter school, or 2nonpublic school shall maintain a supply of an opioid 3antagonist in any secure location where an individual may have 4an opioid overdose, unless there is a shortage of opioid 5antagonists, in which case the school district, public school, 6charter school, or nonpublic school shall make a reasonable 7effort to maintain a supply of an opioid antagonist. Unless 8the school district, public school, charter school, or 9nonpublic school is able to obtain opioid antagonists without 10a prescription, a health care professional who has been 11delegated prescriptive authority for opioid antagonists in 12accordance with Section 5-23 of the Substance Use Disorder Act 13shall prescribe opioid antagonists in the name of the school 14district, public school, charter school, or nonpublic school, 15to be maintained for use when necessary. Any supply of opioid 16antagonists shall be maintained in accordance with the 17manufacturer's instructions. 18    The school district, public school, charter school, or 19nonpublic school may maintain a supply of asthma medication in 20any secure location that is accessible before, during, or 21after school where a person is most at risk, including, but not 22limited to, a classroom, or the nurse's office, or a practice 23field or gym. A physician, a physician assistant who has 24prescriptive authority under Section 7.5 of the Physician 25Assistant Practice Act of 1987, or an advanced practice 26registered nurse who has prescriptive authority under Section   HB4247 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b165-40 of the Nurse Practice Act may prescribe undesignated 2asthma medication in the name of the school district, public 3school, charter school, or nonpublic school to be maintained 4for use when necessary. Any supply of undesignated asthma 5medication must be maintained in accordance with the 6manufacturer's instructions. 7    A school district that provides special educational 8facilities for children with disabilities under Section 914-4.01 of this Code may maintain a supply of undesignated 10oxygen tanks in any secure location that is accessible before, 11during, and after school where a person with developmental 12disabilities is most at risk, including, but not limited to, 13classrooms and lunchrooms. A physician, a physician assistant 14who has prescriptive authority in accordance with Section 7.5 15of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, or an 16advanced practice registered nurse who has prescriptive 17authority in accordance with Section 65-40 of the Nurse 18Practice Act may prescribe undesignated oxygen tanks in the 19name of the school district that provides special educational 20facilities for children with disabilities under Section 2114-4.01 of this Code to be maintained for use when necessary. 22Any supply of oxygen tanks shall be maintained in accordance 23with the manufacturer's instructions and with the local fire 24department's rules. 25    (f-3) Whichever entity initiates the process of obtaining 26undesignated epinephrine injectors and providing training to   HB4247 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1personnel for carrying and administering undesignated 2epinephrine injectors shall pay for the costs of the 3undesignated epinephrine injectors.4    (f-5) Upon any administration of an epinephrine injector, 5a school district, public school, charter school, or nonpublic 6school must immediately activate the EMS system and notify the 7student's parent, guardian, or emergency contact, if known.8    Upon any administration of an opioid antagonist, a school 9district, public school, charter school, or nonpublic school 10must immediately activate the EMS system and notify the 11student's parent, guardian, or emergency contact, if known. 12    (f-10) Within 24 hours of the administration of an 13undesignated epinephrine injector, a school district, public 14school, charter school, or nonpublic school must notify the 15physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 16registered nurse who provided the standing protocol and a 17prescription for the undesignated epinephrine injector of its 18use. 19    Within 24 hours after the administration of an opioid 20antagonist, a school district, public school, charter school, 21or nonpublic school must notify the health care professional 22who provided the prescription for the opioid antagonist of its 23use. 24    Within 24 hours after the administration of undesignated 25asthma medication, a school district, public school, charter 26school, or nonpublic school must notify the student's parent   HB4247 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1or guardian or emergency contact, if known, and the physician, 2physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse who 3provided the standing protocol and a prescription for the 4undesignated asthma medication of its use. The district or 5school must follow up with the school nurse, if available, and 6may, with the consent of the child's parent or guardian, 7notify the child's health care provider of record, as 8determined under this Section, of its use. 9    (g) Prior to the administration of an undesignated 10epinephrine injector, trained personnel must submit to the 11school's administration proof of completion of a training 12curriculum to recognize and respond to anaphylaxis that meets 13the requirements of subsection (h) of this Section. Training 14must be completed annually. The school district, public 15school, charter school, or nonpublic school must maintain 16records related to the training curriculum and trained 17personnel.18    Prior to the administration of an opioid antagonist, 19trained personnel must submit to the school's administration 20proof of completion of a training curriculum to recognize and 21respond to an opioid overdose, which curriculum must meet the 22requirements of subsection (h-5) of this Section. The school 23district, public school, charter school, or nonpublic school 24must maintain records relating to the training curriculum and 25the trained personnel. 26    Prior to the administration of undesignated asthma   HB4247 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1medication, trained personnel must submit to the school's 2administration proof of completion of a training curriculum to 3recognize and respond to respiratory distress, which must meet 4the requirements of subsection (h-10) of this Section. 5Training must be completed annually, and the school district, 6public school, charter school, or nonpublic school must 7maintain records relating to the training curriculum and the 8trained personnel. 9    (h) A training curriculum to recognize and respond to 10anaphylaxis, including the administration of an undesignated 11epinephrine injector, may be conducted online or in person.12    Training shall include, but is not limited to:13        (1) how to recognize signs and symptoms of an allergic 14    reaction, including anaphylaxis;15        (2) how to administer an epinephrine injector; and16        (3) a test demonstrating competency of the knowledge 17    required to recognize anaphylaxis and administer an 18    epinephrine injector.19    Training may also include, but is not limited to:20        (A) a review of high-risk areas within a school and 21    its related facilities;22        (B) steps to take to prevent exposure to allergens;23        (C) emergency follow-up procedures, including the 24    importance of calling 9-1-1 or, if 9-1-1 is not available, 25    other local emergency medical services;26        (D) how to respond to a student with a known allergy,   HB4247 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1    as well as a student with a previously unknown allergy;2        (E) other criteria as determined in rules adopted 3    pursuant to this Section; and4        (F) any policy developed by the State Board of 5    Education under Section 2-3.190.6    In consultation with statewide professional organizations 7representing physicians licensed to practice medicine in all 8of its branches, registered nurses, and school nurses, the 9State Board of Education shall make available resource 10materials consistent with criteria in this subsection (h) for 11educating trained personnel to recognize and respond to 12anaphylaxis. The State Board may take into consideration the 13curriculum on this subject developed by other states, as well 14as any other curricular materials suggested by medical experts 15and other groups that work on life-threatening allergy issues. 16The State Board is not required to create new resource 17materials. The State Board shall make these resource materials 18available on its Internet website.19    (h-5) A training curriculum to recognize and respond to an 20opioid overdose, including the administration of an opioid 21antagonist, may be conducted online or in person. The training 22must comply with any training requirements under Section 5-23 23of the Substance Use Disorder Act and the corresponding rules. 24It must include, but is not limited to:25        (1) how to recognize symptoms of an opioid overdose;26        (2) information on drug overdose prevention and   HB4247 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1    recognition;2        (3) how to perform rescue breathing and resuscitation;3        (4) how to respond to an emergency involving an opioid 4    overdose;5        (5) opioid antagonist dosage and administration;6        (6) the importance of calling 9-1-1 or, if 9-1-1 is 7    not available, other local emergency medical services;8        (7) care for the overdose victim after administration 9    of the overdose antagonist;10        (8) a test demonstrating competency of the knowledge 11    required to recognize an opioid overdose and administer a 12    dose of an opioid antagonist; and13        (9) other criteria as determined in rules adopted 14    pursuant to this Section. 15    (h-10) A training curriculum to recognize and respond to 16respiratory distress, including the administration of 17undesignated asthma medication, may be conducted online or in 18person. The training must include, but is not limited to:19        (1) how to recognize symptoms of respiratory distress 20    and how to distinguish respiratory distress from 21    anaphylaxis;22        (2) how to respond to an emergency involving 23    respiratory distress;24        (3) asthma medication dosage and administration;25        (4) the importance of calling 9-1-1 or, if 9-1-1 is 26    not available, other local emergency medical services;  HB4247 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1        (5) a test demonstrating competency of the knowledge 2    required to recognize respiratory distress and administer 3    asthma medication; and4        (6) other criteria as determined in rules adopted 5    under this Section. 6    (i) Within 3 days after the administration of an 7undesignated epinephrine injector by a school nurse, trained 8personnel, or a student at a school or school-sponsored 9activity, the school must report to the State Board of 10Education in a form and manner prescribed by the State Board 11the following information:12        (1) age and type of person receiving epinephrine 13    (student, staff, visitor);14        (2) any previously known diagnosis of a severe 15    allergy;16        (3) trigger that precipitated allergic episode;17        (4) location where symptoms developed;18        (5) number of doses administered;19        (6) type of person administering epinephrine (school 20    nurse, trained personnel, student); and21        (7) any other information required by the State Board.22    If a school district, public school, charter school, or 23nonpublic school maintains or has an independent contractor 24providing transportation to students who maintains a supply of 25undesignated epinephrine injectors, then the school district, 26public school, charter school, or nonpublic school must report   HB4247 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1that information to the State Board of Education upon adoption 2or change of the policy of the school district, public school, 3charter school, nonpublic school, or independent contractor, 4in a manner as prescribed by the State Board. The report must 5include the number of undesignated epinephrine injectors in 6supply.7    (i-5) Within 3 days after the administration of an opioid 8antagonist by a school nurse or trained personnel, the school 9must report to the State Board of Education, in a form and 10manner prescribed by the State Board, the following 11information:12        (1) the age and type of person receiving the opioid 13    antagonist (student, staff, or visitor);14        (2) the location where symptoms developed;15        (3) the type of person administering the opioid 16    antagonist (school nurse or trained personnel); and17        (4) any other information required by the State Board. 18    (i-10) Within 3 days after the administration of 19undesignated asthma medication by a school nurse, trained 20personnel, or a student at a school or school-sponsored 21activity, the school must report to the State Board of 22Education, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the State 23Board of Education, the following information:24        (1) the age and type of person receiving the asthma 25    medication (student, staff, or visitor);26        (2) any previously known diagnosis of asthma for the   HB4247 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1    person;2        (3) the trigger that precipitated respiratory 3    distress, if identifiable;4        (4) the location of where the symptoms developed;5        (5) the number of doses administered;6        (6) the type of person administering the asthma 7    medication (school nurse, trained personnel, or student);8        (7) the outcome of the asthma medication 9    administration; and10        (8) any other information required by the State Board. 11    (j) By October 1, 2015 and every year thereafter, the 12State Board of Education shall submit a report to the General 13Assembly identifying the frequency and circumstances of 14undesignated epinephrine and undesignated asthma medication 15administration during the preceding academic year. Beginning 16with the 2017 report, the report shall also contain 17information on which school districts, public schools, charter 18schools, and nonpublic schools maintain or have independent 19contractors providing transportation to students who maintain 20a supply of undesignated epinephrine injectors. This report 21shall be published on the State Board's Internet website on 22the date the report is delivered to the General Assembly.23    (j-5) Annually, each school district, public school, 24charter school, or nonpublic school shall request an asthma 25action plan from the parents or guardians of a pupil with 26asthma. If provided, the asthma action plan must be kept on   HB4247 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1file in the office of the school nurse or, in the absence of a 2school nurse, the school administrator. Copies of the asthma 3action plan may be distributed to appropriate school staff who 4interact with the pupil on a regular basis, and, if 5applicable, may be attached to the pupil's federal Section 504 6plan or individualized education program plan.7    (j-10) To assist schools with emergency response 8procedures for asthma, the State Board of Education, in 9consultation with statewide professional organizations with 10expertise in asthma management and a statewide organization 11representing school administrators, shall develop a model 12asthma episode emergency response protocol before September 1, 132016. Each school district, charter school, and nonpublic 14school shall adopt an asthma episode emergency response 15protocol before January 1, 2017 that includes all of the 16components of the State Board's model protocol.17    (j-15) (Blank).18    (j-20) On or before October 1, 2016 and every year 19thereafter, the State Board of Education shall submit a report 20to the General Assembly and the Department of Public Health 21identifying the frequency and circumstances of opioid 22antagonist administration during the preceding academic year. 23This report shall be published on the State Board's Internet 24website on the date the report is delivered to the General 25Assembly. 26    (k) The State Board of Education may adopt rules necessary   HB4247 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 16732 LNS 30139 b1to implement this Section. 2    (l) Nothing in this Section shall limit the amount of 3epinephrine injectors that any type of school or student may 4carry or maintain a supply of.5    (m) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 6Act of the 104th General Assembly are subject to appropriation 7or available grant funding. 8(Source: P.A. 102-413, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 9103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-196, eff. 1-1-24; 103-348, eff. 101-1-24; 103-542, eff. 7-1-24 (see Section 905 of P.A. 103-563 11for effective date of P.A. 103-542); 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)